Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6373.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 103. As used in this act: (a) "LLC member" means a person with ownership interest under the Michigan limited liability company act, 1993 PA 23, MCL 450.4101 to 450.5200. (b) "Loan production office" means an office of the savings bank at which only activities related to money lending are conducted, which is not the principal office or a branch or an agency office or an office of an affiliated depository institution. (c) "Member" means a person holding a savings account of a mutual savings bank. (d) "Messenger service" means a service, such as including, but not limited to, a courier service or an armored car service, that picks up from or delivers to customers of 1 or more depository institutions or 1 or more affiliates of a depository institution cash, currency, checks, drafts, securities, or other items relating to transactions between or involving a depository institution or affiliate of a depository institution and those customers, or that transfers cash, currency, checks, drafts, securities, or other items or documents between depository institutions or affiliates of depository institutions. The A messenger service may be owned and operated by 1 or more depository institutions or affiliates or by a third party. (e) "Mobile branch" means a branch in which the location of the physical structure of the branch is moved from time to time. (f) "Mutual savings bank" means a savings bank for which the articles of incorporation do not authorize the issuance of common or preferred stock. (g) "National bank" means a bank chartered by the federal government under the national bank act, chapter 106, 13 Stat. 99.12 USC 38. (h) "Net income" means the remainder of all earnings from operations plus actual recoveries on loans and investments and other assets, after deducting from the total all operating expenses, actual losses, accrued dividends on preferred stock, if any, and all taxes. (i) "Out-of-state bank" means a banking corporation or savings bank organized under the laws of another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory of the United States whose principal office is located in a state other than this state, the District of Columbia, a territory, or a protectorate of the United States, and whose deposits are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation. (j) "Person" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, governmental entity, partnership, limited liability partnership, or other legal entity. (k) "Publication", "published", and "publish" mean publication in a newspaper printed in the English language and published and circulated in the county where the depository institution is located or, if there is no newspaper published and circulated in the county where the depository institution is located, in any newspaper having general circulation in the county. (l) "Residential real estate" means improved real property that is used or intended to be used as a residence or residences and contains not more than 4 dwelling units. (m) "Savings bank" means a state banking corporation organized or reorganized under this act. (n) "Savings liability" or "deposit liability" means the aggregate amount of accounts of depositors, including interest accrued or credited to the accounts, less redemptions and withdrawals. (o) "Service entity" means a stock corporation, mutual company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership in which a savings bank has invested under section 410. Upon With the written approval of the commissioner, a service entity may be a general partnership. (p) "Shareholder" means the registered owner of any share or shares of capital stock of a savings bank. (q) "Stock savings bank" means a savings bank for which the articles of incorporation authorize the issuance of capital stock. (r) "Subsidiary" means a corporation, mutual company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership, the controlling interests of which are more than 50% owned by 1 or more federally insured depository institutions, and in which a savings bank has an ownership interest, membership interest, or other legally enforceable interest which that has the indicia of ownership. Upon With the written approval of the commissioner, and subject to the ownership requirements set forth in this subsection, a subsidiary may be a general partnership. (s) "Surplus" means the amount paid for issued and outstanding common and preferred stock in excess of the stated par value, plus any amount of transferred undivided profits, and any additional amounts paid in or contributed to increase total capital. (t) "Total capital" means an amount equal to any capital, plus any surplus, undivided profits, and instruments of indebtedness authorized under section 310. (u) "Trust office" means an office of a savings bank at which trust services are performed and at which deposits are not accepted, checks are not paid, and money is not lent. (v) "Undivided profits" means the amount of retained earnings and any additional amounts held in capital reserve accounts of the savings bank. (w) "Uniform commercial code" means the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102. (w) (x) "Value" means the present worth of all rights to future benefits arising from ownership. (x) (y) "Withdrawal value of a deposit account" means the amount invested in a deposit account, plus earnings, less lawful deductions. Sec. 415. (1) Notwithstanding section 1105 of the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, being section 440.1105 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, a A savings bank doing business in this state , that has 1 or more branch offices in any foreign country shall be is liable for contracts to be performed at any branch offices and for deposits to be repaid at the branch offices to no greater extent than a savings bank, banking corporation, or other organization or association for banking purposes organized and existing under the laws of the foreign country would be liable under its laws. The laws of the foreign country for the purpose of this section shall be considered to include all acts, decrees, regulations, and orders promulgated or enforced by an authority asserting governmental, military, or police power of any kind at the place where any branch office is located, whether or not the dominant authority is recognized as a de facto or de jure government. (2) Notwithstanding section 1105 of Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, if If by action of a dominant authority that is not recognized by the United States as the de jure government of the foreign territory concerned, any property situated in or any amount to be received in the foreign territory and carried as an asset of any branch office of the savings bank in the foreign territory is seized, destroyed, or canceled, then the liability of the savings bank for any deposit received and to be repaid by it, and for any contract made and to be performed by it, at any branch office in the foreign territory shall must be reduced pro tanto by the proportion that the value, as shown by the books or other records of the savings bank at the time of the seizure, destruction, or cancellation of the assets bears to the aggregate of all the deposit and contract liabilities of the branch offices of the savings bank in the foreign territory, as shown at such that time by the books or other records of the savings bank. Sec. 501. (1) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the capital of a savings bank has become impaired, the commissioner shall notify the savings bank of his or her the commissioner's determination and require the directors to meet the deficiency in the capital within a 2-month period. The directors shall meet the deficiency by either making a pro rata assessment upon on the stock held by each shareholder, or taking steps to dissolve the bank. The 2-month period may be extended by order of the commissioner, if in his or her the commissioner's discretion an extension is necessary to allow the directors to meet the deficiency. (2) Before an assessment may be made by the directors, each shareholder, secured party, and pledgee indicated on the books of the savings bank as holding an interest in the stock shall must be provided with written notice in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice of the determination made by the commissioner that the capital of the savings bank is impaired and the amount of the assessment that each shareholder must pay. (3) If a shareholder refuses or neglects to pay an assessment levied by the directors within not later than 30 days from after the date notice was provided, the directors shall sell all or part of the shareholder's shares to the highest bidder in a manner provided in this section. Upon On expiration of the 30-day period and refusal or neglect by a shareholder to pay the assessment, a security interest in favor of the savings bank in the amount of the assessment shall attach attaches to all of the shareholder's shares for the sole purpose of satisfying the assessment levied. The security interest shall have has priority over any other security interests perfected by a creditor or otherwise granted by the shareholder in shares issued after the effective date of this act.January 11, 2001. (4) If the directors fail to restore the capital of the savings bank or take steps to dissolve the savings bank during the 2-month period following notice from the commissioner and any extension granted under subsection (1), the commissioner may appoint a receiver for the savings bank in accordance with this act. (5) If any part of the capital of a savings bank consists of preferred stock, the determination of whether the capital of the savings bank is impaired and the amount of the impairment shall must be based upon on the par value of its stock even though the amount that the holders of the preferred stock shall be are entitled to receive in the event of retirement or dissolution shall be is in excess of the par value of the preferred stock. (6) The holders of preferred stock shall are not be liable for assessments to restore impairment in the capital of a savings bank. (7) If, 30 days after notice as provided in this section, a shareholder has refused or neglected to pay an assessment levied on the shares held by the shareholder, the directors may sell any or all of the shareholder's shares to satisfy the assessment. The proceeds of the sale shall must be distributed in the following order: (a) The reasonable expenses of holding for sale and selling the stock in a manner not prohibited by law, including reasonable attorney fees and legal expenses incurred by the savings bank. (b) The satisfaction of the assessment levied by the directors. (c) The satisfaction of an indebtedness secured by any security interest in the stock if written notification demanding proceeds is received by the savings bank before distribution of the proceeds is completed. Unless the holder of a security interest provides reasonable proof of the interest, the savings bank does not have to comply with this subdivision. (d) Any remaining surplus shall must be distributed to the shareholder. (8) Disposition of the stock may be at a public or private sale at any time and on any terms, but every aspect of the disposition including the method, manner, time, place, and terms shall must be commercially reasonable and reasonably calculated to meet the deficiency. (9) A sale of stock as provided in this section shall effect constitutes an absolute cancellation of any outstanding certificates evidencing the stock sold and any security interest granted or pledge made in stock issued after the effective date of this act. Upon January 11, 2001. On full payment of the stock sold, the savings bank shall issue new certificates to the purchaser. (10) The purchaser takes the stock free of any rights or interests the shareholder may have based on an unintentional failure by the savings bank to comply with this section if all of the following apply: (a) The purchaser has no knowledge of any defect in the proceedings. (b) The purchaser does not act in collusion with any shareholders of the savings bank, a secured party, other bidders, or the savings bank. (c) The purchaser makes the purchase in good faith. (11) The ability of a savings bank to make an assessment under this section or to sell the stock of a shareholder under this section is not limited by the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, 440.1101 to 440.12501. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.